src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-nínaa_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ninaawa - ok : # -m animate noun, chief AEW NA1
     ninaawa+NA+Sg: ninaawa
     ninaawa+NA+Pl: ninaiksi
     ninaawa+NA+Obv: ninaayi
     ninaawa+NA+Non: ninai
     
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nitsinaima, nitsinaawa ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nitsinaimiksi, nitsinaiksi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: [ nitsinaimi, nitsinaayi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: [ nitsinaimi, nitsinai ]
     
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nitsinaiminnaana, nitsinaannaana ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nitsinaiminnaaniksi, nitsinaannaaniksi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: [ nitsinaiminnaani, nitsinaannaani ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: [ nitsinaiminnaani, nitsinaannaani ]

     ninaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kitsinaiminnoona, kitsinaannoona ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kitsinaiminnooniksi, kitsinaannooniksi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: [ kitsinaiminnooni, kitsinaannooni ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: [ kitsinaiminnooni, kitsinaannooni ]

     ninaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kitsinaima, kitsinaawa ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kitsinaimiksi, kitsinaiksi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: [ kitsinaimi, kitsinaayi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: [ kitsinaimi, kitsinai ]

     ninaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kitsinaimoaawa, kitsinaawaawa ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kitsinaimoaawaiksi, kitsinaawaawaiksi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: [ kitsinaimoaawayi, kitsinaawaawayi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: [ kitsinaimoaawai, kitsinaawaawai ]

     ninaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: [ otsinaimiksi, otsinaiksi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: [ otsinaimi, otsinaayi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: [ otsinaimi, otsinai ]

     ninaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: [ otsinaimoaawaiksi, otsinaawaawaiksi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: [ otsinaimoaawayi, otsinaawaawayi ]
     ninaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: [ otsinaimoaawai, otsinaawaawai ]

     PS/omahk+ninaawa+NA+Pl: omahksinaiksi
